Utah statutes.
13-43-206.   Advisory opinion -- Process.
(1)  A request for an advisory opinion under Section 13-43-205 shall be:
(a)  filed with the Office of the Property Rights Ombudsman; and
(b)  accompanied by a filing fee of $150.
(2)  The Office of the Property Rights Ombudsman may establish policies
providing for partial fee waivers for a person who is financially unable to
pay the entire fee.
(3)  A person requesting an advisory opinion need not exhaust administrative
remedies, including remedies described under Section 10-9a-801 or 17-27a-801,
before requesting an advisory opinion.
(4)  The Office of the Property Rights Ombudsman shall:
(a)  deliver notice of the request to opposing parties indicated in the
request;
(b)  inquire of all parties if there are other necessary parties to the
dispute; and
(c)  deliver notice to all necessary parties.
(5)  If a governmental entity is an opposing party, the Office of the Property
Rights Ombudsman shall deliver the request in the manner provided for in
Section 63G-7-401.
(6) (a)  The Office of the Property Rights Ombudsman shall promptly determine
if the parties can agree to a neutral third party to issue an advisory
opinion.
(b)  If no agreement can be reached within four business days after notice is
delivered pursuant to Subsections (4) and (5), the Office of the Property
Rights Ombudsman shall appoint a neutral third party to issue an advisory
opinion.
(7)  All parties that are the subject of the request for advisory opinion
shall:
(a)  share equally in the cost of the advisory opinion; and
(b)  provide financial assurance for payment that the neutral third party
requires.
(8)  The neutral third party shall comply with the provisions of Section
78B-11-109, and shall promptly:
(a)  seek a response from all necessary parties to the issues raised in the
request for advisory opinion;
(b)  investigate and consider all responses; and
(c)  issue a written advisory opinion within 15 business days after the
appointment of the neutral third party under Subsection (6)(b), unless:
(i)  the parties agree to extend the deadline; or
(ii)  the neutral third party determines that the matter is complex and
requires additional time to render an opinion, which may not exceed 30
calendar days.
(9)  An advisory opinion shall include a statement of the facts and law
supporting the opinion's conclusions.
(10) (a)  Copies of any advisory opinion issued by the Office of the Property
Rights Ombudsman shall be delivered as soon as practicable to all necessary
parties.
(b)  A copy of the advisory opinion shall be delivered to the government
entity in the manner provided for in Section 63G-7-401.
(11)  An advisory opinion issued by the Office of the Property Rights
Ombudsman is not binding on any party to, nor admissible as evidence in, a
dispute involving land use law except as provided in Subsection (12).
(12) (a)  If the same issue that is the subject of an advisory opinion is
listed as a cause of action in litigation, and that cause of action is
litigated on the same facts and circumstances and is resolved consistent with
the advisory opinion, the substantially prevailing party on that cause of
action may collect reasonable attorney fees and court costs pertaining to the
development of that cause of action from the date of the delivery of the
advisory opinion to the date of the court's resolution.
(b)  Nothing in this Subsection (12) is intended to create any new cause of
action under land use law.
(13)  Unless filed by the local government, a request for an advisory opinion
under Section 13-43-205 does not stay the progress of a land use application,
or the effect of a land use decision.
